Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2152
Sale of entire property; when ordered.

If in any of the foregoing cases, it shall appear to the court that the mortgaged premises are so situated that a sale of the whole will be most beneficial to the parties, the decree shall, in the first instance, be entered for the sale of the whole premises accordingly.

R.S.1867, Code § 860, p. 544;

R.S.1913, § 8269;

C.S.1922, § 9222;

C.S.1929, § 20-2154;

R.S.1943, § 25-2152.

Where no such finding and decree, tracts must be appraised and sold separately. Rohrer v. Fassler, 2 Neb. Unof. 262, 96 N.W. 523 (1902).